sk_SK/rue_SK.aff
# хлопець, Японець
SFX p Y 11
SFX p ець ця ець
SFX p ець цёви ець
SFX p ець цём ець
SFX p ець цями ець
SFX p ець цю ець
SFX p ець цї ець
SFX p ець цїв ець
SFX p ець цям ець
SFX p ець цїм ець #дозволена алтернатіва ям/їм
SFX p ець цях ець
SFX p ець цёх ець #дозволена алтернатіва ях/ёх

# горнятко, Різдво, пусто, говедо, лайно, чало
SFX r Y 10
SFX r о а о
SFX r о у о
SFX r о ї [тлднцсз]о
SFX r о і [в]о
SFX r о ом о
SFX r о ам о
SFX r о ах о
SFX r о ами о
SFX r ко ок тко
SFX r о 0 о
